Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,217
Judgment; effect.

Final judgment in any suit under the State Tort Claims Act shall constitute a complete bar to any action by the claimant, by reason of the same subject matter, against the employee of the state whose act or omission gave rise to the claim. This section shall not apply if the court rules that the claim is not permitted under the State Tort Claims Act.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 9, p. 2848;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 28.